Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 42 of Title 27, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In any judicial condemnation proceeding, other than those
authorized by Section 7 of this title, or any proceeding authorized
under Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the owner of an interest in
property sought to be condemned shall be entitled, through the
timely filing of an exception to the report of the commissioners in
such proceeding, to a hearing on the issues of public use or
necessity of the taking. At any such hearing, the condemning
authority shall bear the burden of proving by a preponderance of the
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3453 Page 1

evid ence that the proposed taking is for a public use authorized by
law, and that the property sought to be taken is reasonably
necessary to accomplish that public use. The burden of proof shall
remain with the condemning authority at all times, and a resolution
or declaration of necessity from the condemning authority shall not,
in and of itself, be conclusive or sufficient evidence of necessity.
B. If, upon a hearing on public use or necessity, the
condemning authority shall fail to establish its right to condemn
the property, or any part thereof, the property owner shall be
entitled to an award of reasonable attorney fees, costs, and expert
witness fees, to be taxed and collected as costs in a civil action.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate




ENGR. H. B. NO. 3453 Page 2